Washington statutes.
RCW 43.79.010

General fund, how constituted.

All moneys paid into the state treasury, except moneys received from taxes levied for specific purposes, and the several permanent funds of the state and the moneys derived therefrom, shall be paid into the general fund of the state.

[ 2007 c 215 s 5; 1965 c 8 s 43.79.010. Prior: 1907 c 8 s 1; RRS s 5509.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—Contingent effective date—2007 c 215: See notes following RCW 39.42.070.